Nebraska, session 109, LB54.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB54 LB54
2025 2025
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated $XXX from the General Fund
for FY2025-26, to the Department of Health and Human Services, for
Program 424, to implement an eleven percent increase to reimbursement
rates paid to providers of developmental disability services, which shall
only be used for this purpose.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated $XXX from Federal Funds for
FY2025-26 to the Department of Health and Human Services, for Program
348, to implement an eleven percent increase to reimbursement rates paid
to providers of developmental disability services, which shall only be
used for this purpose.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-